Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, SB716.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. Section 102 of the act of July 9, 1976 (P.L.817, No.143), known as the Mental Health Procedures Act, is amended to read:Section 102. Statement of Policy.--It is the policy of the Commonwealth of Pennsylvania to seek to assure the availability of adequate treatment to persons [who are mentally ill] with mental illness, and it is the purpose of this act to establish procedures whereby this policy can be effected. The provisions of this act shall be interpreted in conformity with the principles of due process to make voluntary and involuntary treatment available where the need is great and its absence 1234567891011121314151617181920 could result in serious harm to the [mentally ill person] person with mental illness or to others. Treatment on a voluntary basis shall be preferred to involuntary treatment; and in every case, the least restrictions consistent with adequate treatment shall be employed. Persons [who are mentally retarded, senile, alcoholic, or drug dependent shall receive mental health treatment only if they are also diagnosed as mentally ill, but these conditions of themselves shall not be deemed to constitute mental illness: Provided, however, That nothing] with an intellectual disability, an alcohol use disorder or with age- related cognitive decline or dementia s hall receive treatment only if they are also diagnosed with a mental illness, but these conditions of themselves shall not be deemed to constitute mental illness. For the purposes of this act, substance use disorder shall be considered a mental illness that may qualify for treatment under this act. Nothing in this act shall prohibit underutilized State facilities for [the mentally ill] persons with mental illness to be made available for the treatment of alcohol abuse or drug addiction pursuant to the act of April 14, 1972 (P.L.221, No.63), known as the "Pennsylvania Drug and Alcohol Abuse Control Act." Chronically disabled persons 70 years of age or older who have been continuously hospitalized in a State operated facility for at least ten years shall not be subject to the procedures of this act. Such a person's inability to give a rational, informed consent shall not prohibit the department from continuing to provide all necessary treatment to such a person. However, if such a person protests treatment or residence at a State operated facility he shall be subject to the provisions of Article III.Section 2. The definition of "assisted outpatient treatment" 20250SB0716PN0728 - 2 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 in section 103.1 of the act is amended and the section is amended by adding a definition to read:Section 103.1. Definitions.--The following words and phrases when used in this act shall have the meanings given to them in this section unless the context clearly indicates otherwise:"Assisted outpatient treatment." Community-based outpatient social, medical and behavioral health treatment services ordered by a court for a severely mentally disabled person, which may include one or more of the following services:(1) Community psychiatric supportive treatment.(2) Assertive community treatment.(3) Medications.(4) Individual or group therapy.(5) Peer support services.(6) Financial services.(7) Housing or supervised living services.(8) Alcohol [or substance] abuse treatments when the treatment is a co-occurring condition for a person with a primary diagnosis of mental [health] illness.(8.1) Substance use disorder.(9) Any other service prescribed to treat the person's mental illness that either assists the person in living and functioning in the community or helps to prevent a relapse or a deterioration of the person's condition that would be likely to result in a substantial risk of serious harm to the person or others.* * *" Substance use disorder." A treatable mental illness that affects a person's brain and behavior, leading to the person's inability to control the person's use of legal or illegal drugs 20250SB0716PN0728 - 3 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 or medications.* * *Section 3. This act shall take effect in 60 days.20250SB0716PN0728 - 4 - 123